test/src/morphology/N-leeqd_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - lēʼḑ*: # Noun 147 'eng /est leht/fin' - full paradigm
     lēʼḑ*+N+Sg+Nom: lēʼḑ*
     lēʼḑ*+N+Sg+Gen: līʼed
     lēʼḑ*+N+Sg+Par: līʼedtõ
     lēʼḑ*+N+Sg+Dat: līʼedõn
     lēʼḑ*+N+Sg+Ins: līʼedkõks
     lēʼḑ*+N+Sg+Ill: līʼedõ
     lēʼḑ*+N+Sg+Ela: līʼedstõ
     lēʼḑ*+N+Pl+Nom: līʼedõd
     lēʼḑ*+N+Pl+Gen: līʼedõd
     lēʼḑ*+N+Pl+Par: lēʼḑi
     lēʼḑ*+N+Pl+Dat: līʼedõdõn
     lēʼḑ*+N+Pl+Ins: līʼedõdõks
     lēʼḑ*+N+Pl+Ill: lēʼḑiž
     lēʼḑ*+N+Pl+Ela: lēʼḑist
